Massachusetts, session 194th, S273.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts State Treasurers Office shall instruct the Massachusetts
State Lottery to develop a second chance game involving all lottery tickets and scratch tickets
that do not contain winning numbers. The purpose of the game shall be to increase the amount of
scratch tickets and lottery tickets recycled and reduce the amount of scratch tickets and lottery
tickets thrown away or littered.
SECTION 2. The second chance game must be operational no later than 180 days of the
passage of this bill.
of 1